Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 10 Hospitalization of Mentally Ill Persons

Cross references. —

As to privileged communication by a licensed or certified mental health professional, see §

33-38-113

.

Commitments to the state mental hospital

must follow the procedures set out in §§

25-10-101

through

25-10-305

.Norman v. State, 747 P.2d 520,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 563

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. Jan. 12, 1988).

Law reviews. —

See article, “A Constitutional Analysis of Involuntary Civil Commitment in Wyoming,” XV Land & Water L. Rev. 141 (1980).